Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 4 Interstate Nurse Licensure Compact
b. Each party state to this compact shall continue to recognize a nurse's multistate licensure privilege to practice in that party state issued under the Prior compact until such party state has withdrawn from the Prior compact.

c. Any party state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same. A party state's withdrawal shall not take effect until six (6) months after enactment of the repealing statute.

d. A party state's withdrawal or termination shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing or terminated state's licensing board to report adverse actions and significant investigations occurring prior to the effective date of such withdrawal or termination.

e. Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any nurse licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a party state and a non-party state that is made in accordance with the other provisions of this compact.

f. This compact may be amended by the party states. No amendment to this compact shall become effective and binding upon the party states unless and until it is enacted into the laws of all party states.

g. Representatives of non-party states to this compact shall be invited to participate in the activities of the Commission, on a nonvoting basis, prior to the adoption of this compact by all states.

Article XI. Construction and Severability

This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. The provisions of this compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any party state or of the United States, or if the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this compact shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of any party state, this compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining party states and in full force and effect as to the party state affected as to all severable matters.

Acts 2016, ch. 591, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 591, § 3 provides that the state board of nursing is directed to inform the executive secretary of the Tennessee Code Commission by letter of the effective dates for the new compact enacted by this act and the withdrawal from the old compact codified in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 63, Chapter 7, Part 3. The state board of nursing informed the executive secretary of the Tennessee Code Commission that the effective date for the new compact and withdrawal from the old compact is January 19, 2018.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 591, § 3. January 19, 2018.